src/morphology/roots/pronouns.lexc
[WORD_ID=jollainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=RELATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:jollaiselle   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jollainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=RELATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:jollaisesta   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jollainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=RELATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:jollaisena    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jollainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=RELATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:jollaisen     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jollainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=RELATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:jollaiseen    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jollainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=RELATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:jollaisessa   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jollainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=RELATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:jollaisen     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jollainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=RELATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:jollainen     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jollainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=RELATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:jollaista     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jollainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=RELATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:jollaiseksi   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jolloinkin][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=QUANTOR]:jolloinkin  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:jommittakummitta     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:jommiltakummilta     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:jommillakummilla     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:jommillekummille     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=CMT]:jompinekumpine   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:jommistakummista     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:jompinakumpina   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:jompienkumpien   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:jompiinkumpiin   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:jommissakummissa     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:jomminkummin     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:jommatkummat     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:jompiakumpia     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:jommiksikummiksi     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:jommattakummatta     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:jommattakummatta     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:jommaltakummalta     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:jommaltakummalta     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:jommallakummalla     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:jommallakummalla     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:jommallekummalle     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:jommallekummalle     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:jommastakummasta     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:jommastakummasta     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:jompanakumpana   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:jompanakumpana   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:jommankumman     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:jommankumman     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:jompaankumpaan   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:jompaankumpaan   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:jommassakummassa     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:jommassakummassa     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:jommankumman     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:jommankumman     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:jompikumpi   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:jompikumpi   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:jompaakumpaa     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:jompaakumpaa     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:jommaksikummaksi     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompikumpi][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:jommaksikummaksi     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompi][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:jommitta   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompi][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:jommilta   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompi][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:jommilla   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompi][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:jommille   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompi][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=CMT]:jompine    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompi][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:jommista   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompi][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:jompina    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompi][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:jompien    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompi][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:jompiin    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompi][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:jommissa   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompi][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:jommin     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompi][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:jommat     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompi][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:jompia     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jompi][POS=PRONOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:jommiksi   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:jonkinlaisitta     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:jonkinlaisilta     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:jonkinlaisilla     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:jonkinlaisille     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=CMT]:jonkinlaisine  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:jonkinlaisista     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:jonkinlaisina  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:jonkinlaisten  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:jonkinlaisiin  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:jonkinlaisissa     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:jonkinlaisin   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:jonkinlaiset   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:jonkinlaisia   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:jonkinlaisiksi     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:jonkinlaisetta     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:jonkinlaiselta     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:jonkinlaisella     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:jonkinlaiselle     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:jonkinlaisesta     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:jonkinlaisena  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:jonkinlaisen   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:jonkinlaiseen  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:jonkinlaisessa     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:jonkinlaisen   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:jonkinlainen   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:jonkinlaista   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonkinlainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:jonkinlaiseksi     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonnekin][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=QUANTOR]:jonnekin  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jonne][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=RELATIVE]:jonne  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=joskus][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=QUANTOR]:joskus  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=jostakin][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=QUANTOR]:jostakin  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kahtaalla][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=QUANTOR]:kahtaalla  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikkialla][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=QUANTOR]:kaikkialla  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikkialla][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=QUANTOR]:kaikkialla  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikkialle][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=QUANTOR]:kaikkialle  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikkialta][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=QUANTOR]:kaikkialta  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:kaikitta   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:kaikilta   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:kaikilla   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:kaikille   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=CMT]:kaikkine   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:kaikista   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:kaikkina   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:kaikkien   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:kaikkiin   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:kaikissa   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:kaikiksi   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:kaiket     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:kaikkia    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:kaikiksi   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:kaiketta   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:kaikelta   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:kaikella   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:kaikelle   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:kaikesta   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:kaikkena   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:kaiken     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kaikki][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:kaikkeen   PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
